District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-701

Statement of policy.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-146, § 2, 31 DCR 6088
Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-197, § 2(a), 37 DCR 4815
Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 32(b), 52 DCR 8113

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-601.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority under Law 5-146, see Mayor’s Order 85-53, May 9, 1985.
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 5-146 to the Director, Department of Human Services, see Mayor’s Order 87-71, March 18, 1987.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 8-197, the “D.C. Emergency Overnight Shelter Amendment Act of 1990”, see Mayor’s Order 91-71, May 8, 1991.

Mayor's Orders

Declaration of an Emergency With Respect to the Urgent Need to Provide Permanent Housing for the Homeless in the District of Columbia: See Mayor’s Order 89-204, September 8, 1989.